test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-kooras_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - kõõrâs class A4â: # Adjective 'hard' - full paradigm
    kõõrâs+A+Pred+Sg: kõõrâs
    kõõrâs+A+Pred+Pl: kõrrâz
    kõõrâs+A+Attr: kõrr
    kõõrâs+A+Comp: kõrrsab
    kõõrâs+A+Superl: kõrrsumus
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Sg+Gen: kõrrâz
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Sg+Acc: kõrrâz
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Sg+Ill: kõrrsa
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Sg+Loc: kõrrsest
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Sg+Com: kõrrsin
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Ess: kõrrsen
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Par: kõrrsed
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Sg+Abe: kõrrâztää
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Pl+Nom: kõrrâz
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Pl+Gen: kõrrsi
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Pl+Acc: kõrrsid
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Pl+Ill: kõrrsid
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Pl+Loc: kõrrsin
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Pl+Com: kõrrsivuiʹm
    kõõrâs+A+Attr+Pl+Abe: kõrrsitää
